SciBin2/dics/ru_RU.dic
агромелиоратор/IIIiIhIk
адамсия/IIIw
аккомпанировка/IIIhIe
аллегоризм/IIIiIhIk
Альбертович/IIIiIqIw
альбион/IIIiIhIk
амфолиты/IHIw
анзерин/IIIiIhIk
Анисим/IIIiIhIk
антимония/IIIw
аргус/IIIiIhIk
Артёмович/IIIiIqIw
архиепископство/IH
архитектура/IIIhIw
аспергиллёз/IIIiIhIk
аудитор/IIIiIhIk
байронизм/IIIiIhIk
балясы/IHIw
банк/IIIiIhIk
бараночница/IIIqIw
барбамил/IIIiIhIk
беззвучие/IIIw
белорыбица/IIIqIw
бензоилфторид/IIIiIhIk
биомицин/IIIiIhIk
биотопливо/IH
бирманка/IIIhIe
блюстительница/IIIqIw
бобыль/IIIi
Босх/IIIiIhIk
бригадирство/IH
брильянтин/IIIiIhIk
бромацетон/IIIiIhIk
броня/IIIqIw
бурение/IIIw
бухло/IH
бюргер/IIIiIhIk
валяльщица/IIIqIw
Ванда/IIIhIw
ведерница/IIIqIw
Вермонт/IIIiIhIk
вероотступница/IIIqIw
взаиморасчеты/IHIk
взывание/IIIw
Викторовна/IIIhIe
вираж/IIIiIhIqIw
висмутин/IIIiIhIk
водоотстойник/IIIiIhIk
возня/IIIq
волынщик/IIIiIhIk
впрыскивание/IIIw
впуск/IIIiIhIk
вспрыски/IHIk
выбивальщица/IIIqIw
выплыв/IIIiIhIk
вытрезвитель/IIIi
Галич/IIIiIqIw
ганаш/IIIiIhIw
гандикап/IIIiIhIk
гаптены/IHIk
гексаметилентетрамин/IIIiIhIk
гидрирование/IIIw
гидромонитор/IIIiIhIk
гипертонус/IIIiIhIk
глазёнки/IHIe
говельщица/IIIqIw
гоготунья/IIIw
голоцен/IIIiIhIk
гонды/IHIk
гранд/IIIiIhIk
гренадерша/IIIqIw
гренадин/IIIiIhIk
грипп/IIIiIhIk
гусли/IiIq
двузернянка/IIIhIe
дегидробензол/IIIiIhIk
дезидераты/IHIw
дейтаграмма/IIIhIw
демонтаж/IIIiIqIw
десульфурация/IIIw
дзюдоист/IIIiIhIk
дирижёр/IIIiIhIk
дистанция/IIIw
диуретики/IHIk
Довгань/IIIi
додача/IIIqIw
драматург/IIIiIhIk
древесница/IIIqIw
друг/IHIh
думпкар/IIIiIhIk
духобор/IIIiIhIk
единица/IIIqIw
естественник/IIIiIhIk
жилетник/IIIiIhIk
жилища/IIIqIw
житье/IH
завозня/IIIh
завязка/IIIhIe
зажигательница/IIIqIw
зажинки/IHIe
заплечье/IIIw
заряд/IIIiIhIk
заступница/IIIqIw
зенитчица/IIIqIw
зерноаспиратор/IIIiIhIk
Зиновьевич/IIIiIqIw
зубчик/IIIiIhIk
иды/IHIw
изгнание/IIIw
изменщица/IIIqIw
инвектива/IIIhIw
инвентаризатор/IIIiIhIk
инока/IIIhIw
ионофоры/IHIk
исполнительница/IIIqIw
итог/IIIiIhIk
калибровка/IIIhIe
канчук/IIIiIhIk
капитанша/IIIqIw
карабин/IIIiIhIk
Карпаты/IHIw
катальщица/IIIqIw
катер/IIIhIk
кацап/IIIiIhIk
кипсей/IIIi
Кириллович/IIIiIqIw
клейстер/IHIh
клекотание/IIIw
книгоноша/IIIqIw
козлобородник/IIIiIhIk
комарье/IH
комплекс/IIIiIhIk
конвейерщица/IIIqIw
конкубинат/IIIiIhIk
конурка/IIIhIe
королевич/IIIiIqIw
корпусник/IIIiIhIk
корточки/IHIe
костерчик/IIIiIhIk
крахмальщица/IIIqIw
кринолин/IIIiIhIk
крупа/IIIhIw
кубометр/IIIiIhIk
кукиш/IIIiIqIw
кулачьё/IH
курган/IIIiIhIk
лазутчица/IIIqIw
леер/IIIhIk
лейб-хирург/IIIiIhIk
лептоспиры/IHIw
лет/IIIiIhIk
лётчица/IIIqIw
лонжерон/IIIiIhIk
лохмы/IHIw
луковица/IIIqIw
магнит/IIIiIhIk
майоратство/IH
макроспора/IIIhIw
мандаринка/IIIhIe
медович/IIIiIqIw
мемуары/IHIk
мензула/IIIhIw
мессур/IIIiIhIk
метение/IIIw
мистакокариды/IHIk
многоугольник/IIIiIhIk
морфин/IIIiIhIk
мотоспорт/IIIiIhIk
мочилово/IH
мошенница/IIIqIw
мылонафт/IIIiIhIk
наемничество/IH
наперсница/IIIqIw
нативизм/IIIiIhIk
наутилус/IIIiIhIk
начин/IIIiIhIk
непонятки/IHIe
ниточница/IIIqIw
нолик/IIIiIhIk
носка/IIIhIe
нутро/IH
обиняк/IIIiIhIk
однопомётник/IIIiIhIk
ожеледица/IIIqIw
оккультист/IIIiIhIk
око/IH
Освенцим/IIIiIhIk
остракоды/IHIw
остроконечник/IIIiIhIk
откочевка/IIIhIe
очаровательница/IIIqIw
очи/IHIq
панихида/IIIhIw
парашютист/IIIiIhIk
партнер/IIIiIhIk
партнёрство/IH
пептидаза/IIIhIw
перебежчица/IIIqIw
перекоры/IHIk
перешнуровывание/IIIw
пероксид/IIIiIhIk
печечка/IIIhIe
Платонович/IIIiIqIw
плерезы/IHIw
плюрализм/IIIiIhIk
поверщик/IIIiIhIk
пограничник/IIIiIhIk
подческа/IIIhIe
пожитки/IHIk
покровительница/IIIqIw
политикан/IIIiIhIk
полусапожки/IHIe
полустон/IIIiIhIk
порезник/IIIiIhIk
постолы/IHIw
посягательница/IIIqIw
пред/IIIiIhIk
примарка/IIIhIe
приобретательница/IIIqIw
припорох/IIIiIhIk
проектирование/IIIw
пролегомены/IHIk
протаргол/IIIiIhIk
птичница/IIIqIw
пупс/IIIiIhIk
пушка/IIIhIe
Пьемонт/IHIh
рабкор/IIIiIhIk
разноголосица/IIIqIw
распустеха/IIIhIw
растирка/IIIhIe
раухтопаз/IIIiIhIk
рваньё/IH
репортаж/IIIiIqIw
ризеншнауцер/IIIiIhIk
рицинин/IIIiIhIk
Рочестер/IIIiIhIk
Савельевич/IIIiIqIw
салазки/IHIe
салинг/IIIiIhIk
сантал/IIIiIhIk
свойственник/IIIiIhIk
святки/IHIe
сдирщик/IIIiIhIk
сенаторша/IIIqIw
сжатие/IIIw
симфониетта/IIIhIw
сифилиды/IHIw
скверик/IIIiIhIk
смежник/IIIiIhIk
смертница/IIIqIw
сморода/IIIhIw
Соловки/IHIk
соусница/IIIqIw
соцреализм/IIIiIhIk
спина/IIIhIw
сродство/IH
ссуда/IIIhIw
стратостат/IIIiIhIk
стряпня/IIIq
стук/IIIiIhIk
суконцы/IHIk
суперфиниширование/IIIw
съемцы/IHIk
сюита/IIIhIw
телефон/IIIiIhIk
телица/IIIqIw
терпентин/IIIiIhIk
тес/IIIiIhIk
тиски/IHIk
трахеит/IIIiIhIk
тростильщик/IIIiIhIk
тростильщица/IIIqIw
тряпьё/IH
тюльпанчик/IIIiIhIk
ультиматизм/IIIiIhIk
усище/IIIiIw
уставщица/IIIqIw
уши/IHIq
факс/IIIiIhIk
Филиппович/IIIiIqIw
фольклористика/IIIhIw
фондообразование/IIIw
фосфатазы/IHIw
фотолюбительница/IIIqIw
хаханьки/IHIe
хедив/IIIiIhIk
хетт/IIIiIhIk
ходунки/IHIk
хребтуг/IIIiIhIk
цестодозы/IHIw
циклогексанон/IIIiIhIk
чаровница/IIIqIw
чеканщик/IIIiIhIk
Черёмушки/IHIe
чужеземщина/IIIhIw
чуточка/IHIh
шайка/IIIhIe
шитьё/IH
шифровальщица/IIIqIw
шпон/IIIiIhIk
штампист/IIIiIhIk
шхеры/IHIw
эвритмия/IIIw
электропровод/IIIiIhIk
эндорфин/IIIiIhIk
юрисдикция/IIIw
яловица/IIIqIw
